Illinois, session 104th, HB5286.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act is 5amended by adding Section 17.3 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3305/17.3 new)7    Sec. 17.3. Federal Aid Disaster Fund. The Federal Aid 8Disaster Fund Trust Fund is a federal trust fund in the State 9treasury. The Trust Fund shall be held separate and apart from 10all public moneys or funds of this State. Moneys received by 11the Agency from a federal department or agency may be 12deposited into the Trust Fund. Interest earned by the 13investment or deposit of moneys accumulated in the Trust Fund 14shall be deposited into the Trust Fund. The Agency is 15authorized to expend any moneys in the Trust Fund for the 16specific purposes established by the terms and conditions of 17federal awards received by the Agency and in any amount that 18the Agency deems necessary to make grants and pay expenses in 19connection with its emergency management and preparedness 20programs. 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.